District of Columbia statutes.
25-112

Off-premises retailer’s licenses.

(a)

An off-premises retailer’s license shall authorize the licensee to sell alcoholic beverages from the place described and to deliver the same in the barrel, keg, sealed bottle, or other closed container in which the same was received by the licensee, including the sale of growlers by the holder of an off-premise retailer licensee, class A, notwithstanding any other provision or restrictions of this title.

(a-1)

(1)

An off-premises retailer’s licensee, class B, that is also a full-service grocery store meeting the requirements of § 25-331(d), may also sell beer in growlers.

(2)

(A)

The Board shall promulgate rules within 45 days of [January 14, 2013], to provide a definition of “full-service grocery store” as used in this title.

(B)

Notwithstanding subchapter III of Chapter 3 of this title, the Board shall not issue any new full-service grocery store, off-premises retailer’s class B licenses for 45 days from [January 14, 2013] or until the rulemaking required by this paragraph has been promulgated and approved by the Council, whichever date is sooner.

(C)

Upon approval by the Council of the regulations promulgated by the Board pursuant to this paragraph, the Council shall incorporate the definition of “full-service grocery store” into § 25-101.

(b)

The barrel, keg, sealed bottle, or other closed container shall not be opened, except for the sale of growlers, or the contents consumed, at the licensed establishment.

(c)

The license shall not authorize the licensee to sell to other licensees for resale; provided, that the licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class A, may sell to:

(1)

Caterers licensed under § 25-113(i);

(2)

[Expired];

(2A)

Licensees under a temporary license or an on-premises retailer’s license, class C or D, if the alcoholic beverages were purchased by the off-premises retailer from a licensee under a wholesaler license or brought into the District under a validly issued import permit; provided, that the sales to an on-premises retailer’s class C and D license, may be made only on a Saturday, Sunday, or holiday during the hours when licensees under a wholesaler’s license are closed; provided further, that an on-premises retailer’s licensee shall maintain on the licensed premises for 3 years either a receipt or invoice containing:

(A)

The date of the purchase;

(B)

The quantity and brand name of the alcoholic beverages purchased; and

(C)

The name of the on-premises licensee to which the sale was made; and

(3)

If the licensee that is a member of a pool buying group, to other members of the same pool buying group any alcoholic beverages if:

(A)

A pool member other than the buying agent transfers to another pool member any portion of the alcoholic beverages ordered by the transferee retailer as part of the single transaction pool purchase;

(B)

A transfer pursuant to this section is made within 7 days of the pool delivery without any cost or charge whatsoever being made against the transferee retailer;

(C)

The acquisition of alcoholic beverage products is recorded in an invoice maintained by both participating retailers for 3 years and includes:

(i)

Business name, address, and license number of each licensee;

(ii)

Names, sizes, and quantities of the products transferred;

(iii)

Date that the delivery of products was received;

(iv)

Date that the physical transfer of products was made;

(v)

Unique identifier that links the record with a specific pool order; and

(vi)

The resale certificate number of the licensee acquiring the products for resale.

(d)

There shall be 2 classes of off-premises retailer’s licenses:

(1)

A retailer’s license, class A, shall authorize the licensee to sell spirits, beer, and wine.

(2)

A retailer’s license, class B, shall authorize the licensee to sell beer and wine.

(e)

The licensee under an off-premises retailer’s license, class B, who qualifies for the license as a result of the application of § 25-303(c), § 25-331(d), § 25-332(c), or § 25-333(c), shall:

(1)

File with the Board, within 60 days after the end of each year, a statement of expenditures and receipts by the licensed establishment containing the following:

(A)

The total amount of receipts for the sale of alcoholic beverages, indicating the amount received for the sale of alcoholic beverages, the amount received for the sale of food, and the percentage of the total amount of receipts represented by each amount;

(B)

A statement indicating the method used to compute the amounts and percentages; and

(C)

An affidavit, executed by the individual licensee, partner of an applicant partnership, or the appropriate officer of an applicant corporation or limited liability company, attesting to the truth of the annual statement.

(2)

The annual accounting period, for the purposes of the annual report, shall correspond to each of the 3 years for which a license is issued.

(3)

The making of a false statement on an annual statement shall constitute grounds on which the Board may deny the renewal of a license, or subsequently revoke the license, if the renewal of the license is based in whole or in part on the contents of the false statement.

Jan. 24, 1934, 48 Stat. 324, ch. 4, § 11
Apr. 30, 1934, 48 Stat. 654, ch. 181, § 1
June 18, 1934, 48 Stat. 997, ch. 588
July 2, 1935, 49 Stat. 444, ch. 359
Aug. 27, 1935, 49 Stat. 898, 899, ch. 756, §§ 3-7
June 15, 1938, 52 Stat. 691, ch. 396, §§ 1, 2
May 27, 1949, 63 Stat. 133, ch. 146, title V, § 501
June 29, 1953, 67 Stat. 103, ch. 159, § 404(d)
May 31, 1962, 76 Stat. 89, Pub. L. 87-470, § 1
Dec. 8, 1970, 84 Stat. 1393, Pub. L. 91-535, § 2
Apr. 6, 1977, D.C. Law 1-102, § 2(a), (b), 23 DCR 8732
Apr. 18, 1978, D.C. Law 2-73, § 3, 24 DCR 7066
Mar. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 3-157, § 2(b), 27 DCR 5117
Sept. 29, 1982, D.C. Law 4-157, §§ 6, 15, 29 DCR 3617
Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-204, § 2, 30 DCR 185
Aug. 2, 1983, D.C. Law, 5-16, § 3, 30 DCR 3193
Mar. 8, 1984, D.C. Law 5-51, § 2(a), 30 DCR 5927
Mar. 7, 1987, D.C. Law 6-217, § 5, 34 DCR 907
Aug. 17, 1991, D.C. Law 9-40, § 2(b), 38 DCR 4974
May 24, 1994, D.C. Law 10-122, § 2(e), 41 DCR 1658
Mar. 26, 1999, D.C. Law 12-202, § 2(b), 45 DCR 8412
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 2003(q)(1), 46 DCR 3142
May 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-298, § 101, 48 DCR 2959
Sept. 30, 2004, D.C. Law 15-187, §§ 101(b), 401(d), 51 DCR 6525
May 1, 2013, D.C. Law 19-310, § 2(c), 60 DCR 3410
This section is referenced in § 2-1212.01, § 8-102.01, and § 25-332.
1981 Ed., § 25-112.
1973 Ed., § 25-111.
D.C. Law 15-187, in subsec. (c), added par. (3); and in par. (2) of subsec. (e), substituted “each of the 3 years” for “each of the 2 years”.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-310 added “including the sale of growlers by the holder of an off-premise retailer licensee, class A, notwithstanding any other provision or restrictions of this title” in (a); added (a-1); added “except for the sale of growlers” in (b); and added (c)(2A) and made a related change.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Emergency Amendment Act of 2012 (D.C. Act 19-597, January 14, 2013, 60 DCR 1001).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 2(c) of the Omnibus Alcoholic Beverage Regulation Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-52, April 22, 2013, 60 DCR 6372, 20 DCSTAT 1388).

Paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this section expired 18 months after May 3, 2001.

Sections 402 and 403 of D.C. Law 15-187 provided:

“Sec. 402. Rules and regulations.

“The Mayor shall promulgate proposed rules and regulations to administer this title within 180 days of its effective date. The proposed rules and regulations, as well as any subsequent rules and regulations amending this title, shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess, If the Council does not approve or disapprove the rules and regulations, in whole or in part, by resolution with the 45-day review period, the proposed rules and regulations shall be deemed approved.

“Sec. 403. Applicability.

“Section 401 shall apply upon the effective date of the regulations promulgated under section 402.”